Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 18.2. Transit Capital Project Revenue Advisory Board.

§§ 33.2-1840 through 33.2-1844.

Expired.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

33.2-1840

through 33.2-1844, pertaining to the Transit Capital Project Revenue Advisory Board, were enacted by Acts 2016, c. 609, and expired July 1, 2018, pursuant to Acts 2016, c. 609, cl. 3.